West Virginia, session 2025, HB3298.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. MISCELLANEOUS. §18B-14-12. COVID-19 vaccines and boosters as prerequisite for attendance prohibited. No college or university in West Virginia may require a student to take the COVID-19 vaccine, or booster shot associated with the COVID-19 vaccine, as a prerequisite for enrolling or attending in-person classes.